Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. Warehouse Receipts:
Special Provisions.

Sec. 45.07.201.
Person who may issue a warehouse receipt; storage under bond.

A warehouse receipt may be issued by a warehouse.

If goods, including distilled spirits and agricultural commodities, are stored under a statute requiring a bond against withdrawal or a license for the issuance of receipts in the nature of warehouse receipts, a receipt issued for the goods is considered to be a warehouse receipt even if issued by a person who is the owner of the goods and is not a warehouse.

History.

(§ 7.201 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 31 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, rewrote the section heading, which read, “Who may issue a warehouse receipt; storage under government bond.”; in (a), substituted “warehouse” for “warehouseman” following “may be issued by a”; in (b), substituted “is considered to be” for “has like effect as” following “receipt issued for the goods”, substituted “if” for “though” following “warehouse receipt even”, and substituted “warehouse” for “warehouseman” at the end of the subsection.

Sec. 45.07.202.
Form of warehouse receipt; effect of omission.

A warehouse receipt need not be in a particular form.

Unless a warehouse receipt provides for each of the following, the warehouse is liable for damages caused to a person injured by its omission:

a statement of the location of the warehouse facility where the goods are stored;

the date of issue of the receipt;

the unique identification code of the receipt;

a statement whether the goods received will be delivered to the bearer, to a named person, or to a named person or the named person’s order;

the rate of storage and handling charges, unless goods are stored under a field warehousing arrangement, in which case a statement of that fact is sufficient on a nonnegotiable receipt;

a description of the goods or the packages containing them;

the signature of the warehouse or its agent;

if the receipt is issued for goods that the warehouse owns, solely, jointly, or in common with others, a statement of that ownership; and

a statement of the amount of advances made and of liabilities incurred for which the warehouse claims a lien or security interest, unless the precise amount of advances made or liabilities incurred, at the time of the issue of the receipt, is unknown to the warehouse or to its agent who issued the receipt, in which case, a statement of the fact that advances have been made or liabilities incurred and the purpose of the advances or liabilities is sufficient.

A warehouse may insert in its receipt terms that are not contrary to the code and do not impair its obligation of delivery under AS

45.07.403

or its duty of care under AS

45.07.204

. A contrary provision is ineffective.

History.

(§ 7.202 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 32 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, rewrote the section.

Sec. 45.07.203.
Liability for nonreceipt or misdescription.

A party to or purchaser for value in good faith of a document of title, other than a bill of lading, that relies on the description of the goods in the document may recover from the issuer damages caused by the nonreceipt or misdescription of the goods, except to the extent that

the document conspicuously indicates that the issuer does not know whether all or part of the goods in fact were received or conform to the description, as in the case where the description is in terms of marks or labels or kind, quantity, or condition, or the receipt or description is qualified by “contents, condition, and quality unknown,” “said to contain,” or words of similar import, if this indication is true; or

the party or purchaser otherwise has notice of the nonreceipt or misdescription.

History.

(§ 7.203 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 33 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the introductory language, substituted “, that relies on” for “relying in either case upon”, and made a stylistic change; added the (1) and (2) designations, and, in (1), substituted “whether all or part” for “whether any part or all”, added “in the case” preceding “where the description”, substituted “or” for “of” preceding “kind, quantity, or condition,” substituted “words of similar import” for “the like” preceding “, if this indication is true”, and made a stylistic change; in (2), added “of the nonreceipt or misdescription”.

Sec. 45.07.204.
Duty of care; contractual limitation of warehouse’s liability.

A warehouse is liable for damages for loss of or injury to the goods caused by the warehouse’s failure to exercise care with regard to the goods that a reasonably careful person would exercise under similar circumstances. Unless otherwise agreed, the warehouse is not liable for damages that could not have been avoided by the exercise of this care.

Damages may be limited by a term in the warehouse receipt or storage agreement limiting the amount of liability in case of loss or damage beyond which the warehouse is not liable. The limitation is not effective with respect to the warehouse’s liability for conversion to its own use. On request of the bailor in a record at the time of signing the storage agreement, or within a reasonable time after receipt of the warehouse receipt, the warehouse’s liability may be increased on part or all of the goods covered by the storage agreement or the warehouse receipt. In this event, increased rates may be charged based on an increased valuation of the goods.

Reasonable provisions as to the time and manner of presenting claims and commencing actions based on the bailment may be included in the warehouse receipt or storage agreement.

History.

(§ 7.204 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 34 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the section heading, and throughout the section, substituted “warehouse” or similar, for “warehouseman” or similar; in (a), added “warehouse’s” preceding “failure to exercise”, and made stylistic changes; rewrote (b), which read, “Damages may be limited by a term in the warehouse receipt or storage agreement limiting the amount of liability in case of loss or damage, and setting out a specific liability per article or item, or value per unit of weight, beyond which the warehouseman shall not be liable; however, this liability may, on written request of the bailor at the time of signing the storage agreement, or within a reasonable time after receipt of the warehouse receipt, be increased on part or all of the goods under the receipt or agreement.
In this event, increased rates may be charged based on the increased valuation, but no increase may be permitted contrary to a lawful limitation of liability contained in the warehouseman’s tariff.
No limitation is effective with respect to the warehouseman’s liability for conversion to the warehouseman’s own use.”; in (c), substituted “commencing” for “instituting” following “presenting claims and”, and substituted “storage agreement” for “tariff” at the end of the subsection.

Sec. 45.07.205.
Title under warehouse receipt defeated in certain cases.

A buyer in ordinary course of business of fungible goods sold and delivered by a warehouse that is also in the business of buying and selling those goods takes the goods free of any claim under a warehouse receipt even if the receipt is negotiable and has been duly negotiated.

History.

(§ 7.205 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 35 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, substituted “warehouse that” for “warehouseman who” following “sold and delivered by a”, substituted “if the receipt is negotiable and” for “though it”, following “under a warehouse receipt even”; made stylistic changes.

Sec. 45.07.206.
Termination of storage at warehouse’s option.

A warehouse may, by giving notice to the person on whose account the goods are held and other persons known to claim an interest in the goods, require payment of any charges and removal of the goods from the warehouse at the termination of the period of storage fixed by the document of title, or, if a period is not fixed, within a stated period not less than 30 days after the warehouse gives notice. If the goods are not removed before the date specified in the notice, the warehouse may sell them under AS

45.07.210

.

If a warehouse in good faith believes that goods are about to deteriorate or decline in value to less than the amount of its lien within the time provided in (a) of this section and AS

45.07.210

, the warehouse may specify in the notice given under (a) of this section a reasonable shorter time for removal of the goods and, if the goods are not removed, may sell them at public sale held not less than one week after a single advertisement or posting.

If, as a result of a quality or condition of the goods of which the warehouse did not have notice at the time of deposit, the goods are a hazard to other property, the warehouse facilities, or other persons, the warehouse may sell the goods at public or private sale without advertisement or posting on reasonable notification to all persons known to claim an interest in the goods. If the warehouse, after a reasonable effort, is unable to sell the goods, the warehouse may dispose of them in a lawful manner and does not incur liability by reason of this disposition.

A warehouse shall deliver the goods to a person entitled to them under this chapter on due demand made at any time before sale or other disposition under this section.

A warehouse may satisfy the warehouse’s lien from the proceeds of a sale or disposition under this section, but shall hold the balance for delivery on the demand of a person to whom the warehouse would have been bound to deliver the goods.

History.

(§ 7.206 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 36 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the section heading, and throughout the section, substituted “warehouse’s” or similar for “warehouseman’s” or similar; in (a), added “of title” following “fixed by the document”, substituted “under AS

45.07.210

” for “in accordance with the provisions of the section on enforcement of a warehouseman’s lien (AS

45.07.210

)” at the end of the subsection; made stylistic changes; in (b), substituted “and AS 45.07.210” for “for notification, advertisement, and sale”, substituted “notice given under (a) of this section” for “notification”, and made stylistic changes; in (c), added “facilities” following “other property, the warehouse”; made stylistic changes; in (d), made stylistic changes; and in (e), substituted “shall” for “must” following “under this section, but”.

Collateral references. —

Improper sale, removal, concealment, or disposal of property subject to security interest under UCC, 48 ALR4th 819.

Sec. 45.07.207.
Goods must be kept separate; fungible goods.

Unless the warehouse receipt provides otherwise, a warehouse shall keep separate the goods covered by each receipt so as to permit at all times identification and delivery of those goods. However, different lots of fungible goods may be commingled.

If different lots of fungible goods are commingled, the goods are owned in common by the persons entitled to them, and the warehouse is severally liable to each owner for that owner’s share. If, because of overissue, a mass of fungible goods is insufficient to meet all the receipts that the warehouse has issued against it, the persons entitled include all holders to whom overissued receipts have been duly negotiated.

History.

(§ 7.207 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 37 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (b), substituted “If different lots of fungible” for “Fungible”, substituted “warehouse” for “warehouseman”, and similar, throughout, and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 45.07.208.
Altered warehouse receipts.

If a blank in a negotiable warehouse receipt has been filled in without authority, a good faith purchaser for value and without notice of the lack of authority may treat the insertion as authorized. Any other unauthorized alteration leaves a tangible or electronic warehouse receipt enforceable against the issuer according to its original tenor.

History.

(§ 7.208 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 38 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, added “good faith” preceding “purchaser”, and substituted “lack” for “want” in the first sentence; in the second sentence, added “tangible or electronic warehouse” preceding “receipt enforceable against the issuer”.

Sec. 45.07.209.
Lien of warehouse.

A warehouse has a lien against the bailor on the goods covered by a warehouse receipt or storage agreement or on the proceeds of the goods in the warehouse’s possession for charges for storage or transportation, including demurrage and terminal charges, insurance, labor, or other charges, present or future, in relation to the goods, and for expenses necessary for preservation of the goods or reasonably incurred in their sale under law. If the person on whose account the goods are held is liable for similar charges or expenses in relation to other goods whenever deposited and it is stated in the warehouse receipt or storage agreement that a lien is claimed for charges and expenses in relation to other goods, the warehouse also has a lien against the goods covered by the warehouse receipt or storage agreement or on the proceeds of the goods in its possession for these charges and expenses, whether or not the other goods have been delivered by the warehouse. However, as against a person to whom a negotiable warehouse receipt is duly negotiated, a warehouse’s lien is limited to charges in an amount or at a rate specified in the warehouse receipt or, if no charges are specified, then to a reasonable charge for storage of the specific goods covered by the receipt after the date of the receipt.

A warehouse may also reserve a security interest against the bailor for the maximum amount specified on the receipt for charges other than those specified in (a) of this section, such as for money advanced and interest. The security interest is governed by AS 45.29.

A warehouse’s lien for charges and expenses under (a) of this section or a security interest under (b) of this section is also effective against a person who entrusted the bailor with possession of the goods to the extent that a pledge of them by the bailor to a good faith purchaser for value would have been valid. However, the lien or security interest is not effective against a person who, before issuance of a document of title, had a legal interest or a perfected security interest in the goods and did not

deliver or entrust the goods or a document of title covering the goods to the bailor or the bailor’s nominee with

actual or apparent authority to ship, store, or sell;

power to obtain delivery under AS

45.07.403

; or

power of disposition under AS

45.02.403

, AS

45.12.304(b)

,

45.12.305(b)

, AS

45.29.320

,

45.29.321(c)

, or other statute or rule of law; or

acquiesce in the procurement by the bailor or its nominee of a document.

A warehouse loses its lien on any goods that the warehouse voluntarily delivers or unjustifiably refuses to deliver.

A warehouse’s lien on household goods for charges and expenses in relation to the goods under (a) of this section is also effective against all persons if the depositor was the legal possessor of the goods at the time of deposit. In this subsection, “household goods” means furniture, furnishings, or personal effects used by the depositor in a dwelling.

History.

(§ 7.209 ch 114 SLA 1962; am §§ 39, 40 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.09” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in the section heading and throughout the section, substituted “warehouse” or similar for “warehouseman” or similar; in (a), added “storage agreement or” preceding “on the proceeds of the goods”, in the first sentence; in the second sentence, substituted “warehouse receipt or storage agreement” for “receipt”, and “the goods covered by the warehouse receipt or storage agreement or on the proceeds of the goods in its possession” for “that person”; in the third sentence, added “specific” preceding “goods covered by the receipt”; in (b), rewrote the second sentence, which read, “Such a security interest is governed by AS 45.29 on secured transactions.”; rewrote (c), which read, “A warehouseman’s lien for charges and expenses under (a) of this section or a security interest under (b) of this section is also effective against a person who so entrusted the bailor with possession of the goods that a pledge of them by the bailor to a good faith purchaser for value would have been valid, but is not effective against a person as to whom the document confers no right in the goods covered by it under AS

45.07.503

.”; added (e); made stylistic changes throughout the section.

Sec. 45.07.210.
Enforcement of warehouse’s lien.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, a warehouse’s lien may be enforced by public or private sale of the goods, in block or in packages, at any time or place, and on any terms that are commercially reasonable, after notifying all persons known to claim an interest in the goods. This notification must include a statement of the amount due, the nature of the proposed sale, and the time and place of any public sale. The fact that a better price could have been obtained by a sale at a different time or in a method different from that selected by the warehouse is not of itself sufficient to establish that the sale was not made in a commercially reasonable manner. The warehouse sells in a commercially reasonable manner if the warehouse sells the goods in the usual manner in a recognized market for the goods, sells at the price current in the market at the time of the sale, or otherwise sells in conformity with commercially reasonable practices among dealers in the type of goods sold. A sale of more goods than apparently necessary to be offered to ensure satisfaction of the obligation is not commercially reasonable, except in cases covered by the preceding sentence.

A warehouse may enforce its lien on goods, other than goods stored by a merchant in the course of the merchant’s business, only if the following requirements are satisfied:

all persons known to claim an interest in the goods must have been notified;

the notification must include an itemized statement of the claim, a description of the goods subject to the lien, a demand for payment within a specified time not less than 10 days after receipt of the notification, and a conspicuous statement that, unless the claim is paid within that time, the goods will be advertised for sale and sold by auction at a specified time and place;

the sale must conform to the terms of the notification;

the sale must be held at the nearest suitable place to where the goods are held or stored;

after the expiration of the time given in the notification, an advertisement of the sale must be published once a week for two weeks consecutively in a newspaper of general circulation where the sale is to be held; the advertisement must include a description of the goods, the name of the person on whose account the goods are being held, and the time and place of the sale; the sale must take place at least 15 days after the first publication; if there is no newspaper of general circulation where the sale is to be held, the advertisement must be posted at least 10 days before the sale in not fewer than three conspicuous places in the neighborhood of the proposed sale.

Before a sale under this section, a person claiming a right in the goods may pay the amount necessary to satisfy the lien and the reasonable expenses incurred in complying with this section. In that event, the goods may not be sold, but must be retained by the warehouse subject to the terms of the receipt and this chapter.

A warehouse may buy at a public sale held under this section.

A purchaser in good faith of goods sold to enforce a warehouse’s lien takes the goods free of the rights of persons against whom the lien was valid, despite the warehouse’s noncompliance with this section.

A warehouse may satisfy its lien from the proceeds of a sale under this section, but shall hold the balance, if any, for delivery on demand to a person to whom the warehouse would have been bound to deliver the goods.

The rights provided by this section are in addition to all other rights allowed by law to a creditor against a debtor, including the remedies available under AS

34.35.225

.

If a lien is on goods stored by a merchant in the course of the merchant’s business, the lien may be enforced in accordance with either (a) or (b) of this section.

A warehouse is liable for damages caused by failure to comply with the requirements for sale under this section and, in case of wilful violation, is liable for conversion.

History.

(§ 7.210 ch 114 SLA 1962; am §§ 41 — 48 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (a), in the first sentence, added “otherwise” preceding “provided in (b), substituted “packages” for “parcels” and added “any” preceding “terms that are commercially reasonable”; in the second sentence, substituted “any public sale” for “a public sale” at the end; rewrote the fourth sentence, which read, “If the warehouseman either sells the goods in the usual manner in a recognized market for the goods, or if the warehouseman sells at the price current in the market at the time of the sale, or if the warehouseman has otherwise sold in conformity with commercially reasonable practices among dealers in the type of goods sold, the warehouseman has sold in a commercially reasonable manner.”; in the fifth sentence, substituted “ensure satisfaction of the obligation” for “insure satisfaction of the obligation”; in (b), rewrote the introductory language, which read, “A warehouseman’s lien on goods other than goods stored by a merchant in the course of the merchant’s business may be enforced only as follows:”, deleted (b)(2), relating to notification by registered letter, and redesignated (b)(3) through (b)(6) as (b)(2) through (b)(5); in (c), in the first sentence, substituted “in complying with” for “under” following “reasonable expenses incurred”; in (d), added “held” following “at a public sale”; in (g), added “, including the remedies available under AS

34.35.225

” at the end of the subsection; throughout the section substituted “warehouse” or similar for “warehouseman” or similar and made stylistic changes.